Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-565
Bonded indebtedness; election; notice.

The resolution provided in section 46-564 shall be published once a week two consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be at least ten days prior to the date set for said election, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, and no other or further notice of such election or publication of the names of election officers or of the precincts or polling places need be given or made.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 31, p. 555.